Utah statutes.
20A-3-305.   Mailing of ballot to voter -- Enclose self-addressed envelope
-- Affidavit.
(1)  Upon timely receipt of an absentee voter application properly filled out
and signed, or as soon after receipt of the application as the official
absentee ballots for the voting precinct in which the applicant resides have
been printed, the election officer shall either:
(a)  give the applicant an official absentee ballot and envelope to vote in
the office; or
(b)  mail an official absentee ballot, postage paid, to the absentee voter and
enclose an envelope printed as required in Subsection (2).
(2)  The election officer shall ensure that:
(a)  the name, official title, and post office address of the election officer
is printed on the front of the envelope; and
(b)  a printed affidavit in substantially the following form is printed on the
back of the envelope:
"County of ____ State of ____
I, ____, solemnly swear that: I am a qualified resident voter of the ____
voting precinct in ____ County, Utah and that I am entitled to vote in that
voting precinct at the next election.  I am not a convicted felon currently
incarcerated for commission of a felony.
______________________________
Signature of Absentee Voter"
(3)  If the election officer determines that the absentee voter is required to
show valid voter identification as indicated in the official register, the
election officer shall:
(a)  issue the voter a provisional ballot in accordance with Section
20A-3-105.5;
(b)  instruct the voter to include a copy of the voter's valid voter
identification with the return ballot;
(c)  provide the voter clear instructions on how to vote a provisional ballot;
and
(d)  comply with the requirements of Subsection (2).
